Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-412
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Agriculture is Nebraska's number one industry;

(2) Water is Nebraska's most precious natural resource;

(3) Nebraska farmers are leading the charge on sustainable agriculture initiatives that will make Nebraska a world-renowned leader and ensure protection of the land and water of Nebraska for generations to come; and

(4) The Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act encourages farmers to adopt efficient and sustainable practices to help Nebraska protect these natural resources and positions Nebraska farmers to compete.

Laws 2024, LB1368, § 2.
December 31, 2029